Utah statutes.
32B-14-101.   Title -- Legislative intent.

(1)  This chapter is known as the "Utah Beer Industry Distribution Act."

(2) (a)  It is the policy of the Legislature to regulate and control the importation, sale, and distribution of beer within the state in the exercise of its powers under the Twenty-first Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and pursuant to the Utah Constitution.

(b)  In furtherance of the policy described in Subsection (2)(a), this chapter is enacted to:

(i)  promote good faith and fair dealing in the business relationships between suppliers, wholesalers, and retailers of beer; and

(ii)  provide for the establishment and maintenance of an orderly system for the distribution of beer in accordance with the laws of the state regulating the sale and distribution of beer to the public.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

